en: Sail shape: Batwing; Delta/V-shape; Lateen; Lug; Round (umbrella); Square; Other
pt-PT: Forma da vela: Asa de morcego; Delta/forma de V; Latina; Vela de estai; Redonda (guarda-chuva); Quadrada; Outro
ru: Форма паруса: Летучая мышь; Дельта/V-образная; Латинский; Люгерный; Круглая (зонт); Квадратная; Другая
zh-TW: 帆形狀: 蝙蝠翼; 三角形 / V 型; 大三角帆; 拉格帆; 圓形 (傘狀); 方形; 其他
vi: Hình dạng cánh buồm: Cánh dơi; Hình delta/chữ V; Tam giác (Lateen); Hình tứ giác (Lug); Hình tròn (cái ô); Hình vuông; Khác
lt-LT: Burės forma: Šikšnosparnio sparno formos; Delta / V formos; Lotyniškoji; Lugerio; Apvali (skėčio formos); Kvadratinė; Kita
nb: Seilform: Flaggermusvinge; Delta / V-form; Latinerseil; Luggerseil; Rundt (paraply); Firkantet; Annet
da: Sejlform: Flagermusvinge; Delta/V-form; Latinersejl; Luggersejl; Rund (paraply); Firkantet; Andet
zh-CN: 船帆形状: 蝙蝠翼; 三角形/V 形; 大三角帆; 斜角纵帆; 圆形（伞状）; 方形; 其他
de: Segelform: Batwing; Delta-/V-Form; Lateinersegel; Luggersegel; Rund (Schirm); Quadratisch; Sonstige
pl: Kształt żagla: Skrzydło nietoperza; Delta/V; Łaciński; Lugrowy; Okrągły (parasol); Kwadratowy; Inny
el: Σχήμα πανιού: Νυχτερίδα (Batwing); Δέλτα/Σχήμα V; Λατίνι; Λουγκ (Lug); Στρογγυλό (ομπρέλα); Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Shapes: Batwing; Delta / V-oblik; Latinsko jedro; Oglavno jedro; Okruglo (kišobran); Kvadratno; Ostalo
tr: Yelken şekli: Yarasa kanadı; Delta/V şeklinde; Latin yelken; Aşırtma yelken; Yuvarlak (şemsiye); Kare; Diğer
cs: Tvar plachty: Netopýří křídlo (Batwing); Delta / tvar V; Latinská; Lugová; Kulatá (deštník); Čtvercová; Jiné
ko: 돛 모양: 배트윙; 델타/V자형; 라틴; 러그; 원형(우산형); 정사각형; 기타
th: รูปทรงใบเรือ: ทรงปีกค้างคาว; ทรงสามเหลี่ยมเดลต้า/ตัววี; ทรงลาทีน; ทรงลัก; ทรงกลม(ร่ม); ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
es: Forma de la vela: Ala de murciélago; Forma de delta/V; Vela latina; Vela al tercio; Redonda (tipo paraguas); Cuadrada; Otro
it: Forma della vela: Batwing; A delta/A V; Latina; Al terzo; Rotonda (a ombrello); Quadra; Altro
ro-RO: Formă a velei: Formă de aripă de liliac; Delta/Formă de V; Velă latină; Velă la treime; Rotundă (umbrelă); Pătrată; Altele
nl: Zeil vorm: Batwing; Delta/V-vorm; Latijnzeil; Lugzeil; Rond (paraplu); Vierkant; Overige
ja: 帆の形状: バットウィング; デルタ / V 字型; ラティーン; ラグ; ラウンド (傘型); スクエア; その他
sv: Seglets form: Fladdermusvinge; Delta/V-formad; Latinsegel; Luggsegel; Rund (paraply); Fyrkantig; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tvar plachty: Netopierie krídlo; Tvar delta/V; Latinská plachta; Lugová plachta; Okrúhla (dáždnik); Štvorcová; Iné
fi: Purjeen muoto: Lepakonsiipi; Delta/V-muoto; Latinalaispurje; Loggerttipurje; Pyöreä (sateenvarjo); Neliö; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на платното: Прилеп; Делта/V-образно; Латинско; Люгерно; Кръгло (чадър); Квадратно; Друго
fr: Forme de la voile: Aile de chauve-souris; Delta / Forme en V; Latine; Au tiers; Ronde (parapluie); Carrée; Autre
pt-BR: Vela formato: Asa de morcego; Delta/em V; Latina; Ao terço; Redondo (guarda-chuva); Quadrado; Outros
sl-SI: Oblika jadra: Netopirjeva krila; Oblika delta/V; Latinsko; Oglavno jadro; Okroglo (dežnik); Kvadratno; Drugo
hu: Vitorla alakja: Denevérszárny; Delta/V-alakú; Latinvitorla; Lugger; Kerek (esernyő); Négyzet alakú; Egyéb